North Carolina, session 2025, HB1204.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-240(c) reads as rewritten:
"(c) The State Board of Education shall from time to time adopt such rules and regulations
with reference to the construction, equipment, color, and maintenance of school buses, the
number of pupils who may be permitted to ride at the same time upon any bus, and the age and
qualifications of drivers of school buses as it shall deem to be desirable for the purpose of
promoting safety in the operation of school buses. Every school bus that is capable of operating
on diesel fuel shall be capable of operating on diesel fuel with a minimum biodiesel concentration
of B-20, as defined in G.S. 143-58.4. No school bus shall be operated for the transportation of
pupils unless such bus is constructed and maintained as prescribed in such regulations and is
equipped with adequate heating facilities, a standard signaling device for giving due notice that
the bus is about to make a turn, an alternating flashing stoplight on the front of the bus, an
alternating flashing stoplight on the rear of the bus, and such other warning devices, fire
protective equipment and first aid supplies as may be prescribed for installation upon such buses
by the regulation of the State Board of Education.The State Board shall adopt rules that address
the construction, equipment, color, and maintenance of school buses, the number of pupils who
may be permitted to ride at the same time upon any bus, and the age and qualifications of drivers
of school buses. Every school bus operated for the transportation of pupils shall comply with the
rules adopted by the State Board. At a minimum, those rules shall address all of the following:
(1) Diesel engine requirements. – Every school bus that is capable of operating
on diesel fuel shall be capable of operating on diesel fuel with a minimum
biodiesel concentration of B-20, as defined in G.S. 143-58.4.
(2) Equipment requirements. – Every school bus shall be equipped with the
following:
a. Adequate heating facilities.
b. A standard signaling device for giving notice that the bus is about to
make a turn.
c. An alternating flashing stoplight on the rear of the bus.
d. Type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable
regulations adopted under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating
positions, except the State Board may adopt reasonable rules
*H1204-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
modifying this requirement with respect to integrated child safety
restraint systems, the transportation of students with disabilities, and
the use of other federally approved restraint or securement systems
where required by federal law.
e. Other warning devices, fire protective equipment, and first aid
supplies deemed necessary by the State Board."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-247 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-247. Purchase of activity buses by local boards.
The several local boards of education in the State are hereby authorized and empowered to
take title to school buses purchased with local or community funds for the purpose of transporting
pupils to and from athletic events and for other local school activity purposes, and commonly
referred to as activity buses.
Each local board of education that operates activity buses shall adopt a policy relative to the
proper use of the vehicles. The policy shall permit the use of these buses for travel to athletic
events during the regular season and playoffs and for travel to other school-sponsored activities.
The provisions of G.S. 115C-42 shall be fully applicable to the ownership and operation of
such activity school buses. Activity buses may also be used as provided in G.S. 115C-243.
A local board of education shall only purchase, lease, or rent activity buses equipped with
type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable regulations adopted under 49
U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating positions, except the local board of education may adopt
reasonable policies modifying this requirement with respect to integrated child safety restraint
systems, the transportation of students with disabilities, and the use of other federally approved
restraint or securement systems where required by federal law."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.40 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.40. Charter school transportation.
The charter school may provide transportation for students enrolled at the school. The charter
school shall develop a transportation plan so that transportation is not a barrier to any student
who resides in the local school administrative unit in which the school is located. The charter
school is not required to provide transportation to any student who lives within one and one-half
miles of the school. At the request of the charter school and if the local board of the local school
administrative unit in which the charter school is located operates a school bus system, then that
local board may contract with the charter school to provide transportation in accordance with the
charter school's transportation plan to students who reside in the local school administrative unit
and who reside at least one and one-half miles of the charter school. A local board may charge
the charter school a reasonable charge that is sufficient to cover the cost of providing this
transportation. Furthermore, a local board may refuse to provide transportation under this section
if it demonstrates there is no available space on buses it intends to operate during the term of the
contract or it would not be practically feasible to provide this transportation. If a charter school
purchases, leases, or rents any school bus or activity bus for the purpose of providing
transportation for students, the charter school shall purchase, lease, or rent vehicles equipped
with type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable regulations adopted
under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating positions, except the charter school may adopt
reasonable policies modifying this requirement with respect to integrated child safety restraint
systems, the transportation of students with disabilities, and the use of other federally approved
restraint or securement systems where required by federal law."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) School transportation. – If a regional school purchases, leases, or rents any
school bus or activity bus for the purpose of providing transportation for
students, the regional school shall purchase, lease, or rent vehicles equipped
with type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable
regulations adopted under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating
Page 2 House Bill 1204-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
positions, except the regional school may adopt reasonable policies modifying
this requirement with respect to integrated child safety restraint systems, the
transportation of students with disabilities, and the use of other federally
approved restraint or securement systems where required by federal law."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(39) School transportation. – If the board of trustees purchases, leases, or rents any
school bus or activity bus for the purpose of providing transportation for
students, the board of trustees shall purchase, lease, or rent vehicles equipped
with type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable
regulations adopted under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating
positions, except the board of trustees may adopt reasonable policies
modifying this requirement with respect to integrated child safety restraint
systems, the transportation of students with disabilities, and the use of other
federally approved restraint or securement systems where required by federal
law."
SECTION 1.(f) Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-548.2. Transportation.
If a private church school or a school of religious charter purchases, leases, or rents any school
bus, as defined in federal motor vehicle safety standards, the private church school or school of
religious charter shall purchase, lease, or rent buses equipped with type-two seat belt assemblies
that are compliant with all applicable regulations adopted under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all
designated seating positions, except the private church school or school of religious charter may
adopt reasonable policies modifying this requirement with respect to integrated child safety
restraint systems, the transportation of students with disabilities, and the use of other federally
approved restraint or securement systems where required by federal law."
SECTION 1.(g) Article 39 of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 115C-566.2. Transportation.
If any qualified nonpublic school purchases, leases, or rents any school bus, as defined in
federal motor vehicle safety standards, the qualified nonpublic school shall purchase, lease, or
rent buses equipped with type-two seat belt assemblies that are compliant with all applicable
regulations adopted under 49 U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating positions, except the
qualified nonpublic school may adopt reasonable policies modifying this requirement with
respect to integrated child safety restraint systems, the transportation of students with disabilities,
and the use of other federally approved restraint or securement systems where required by federal
law."
SECTION 1.(h) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(9a) If a laboratory school purchases, leases, or rents any school bus or activity bus
for the purpose of providing transportation for students, the laboratory school
shall purchase, lease, or rent vehicles equipped with type-two seat belt
assemblies that are compliant with all applicable regulations adopted under 49
U.S.C. § 30111 at all designated seating positions, except the laboratory
school may adopt reasonable policies modifying this requirement with respect
to integrated child safety restraint systems, the transportation of students with
disabilities, and the use of other federally approved restraint or securement
systems where required by federal law."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the
House Bill 1204-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
purpose of developing policies that public school units may use to implement the requirements
of this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law. G.S. 115C-240(c)(2)d., as
enacted by this act, applies to all contracts to purchase or lease school buses and activity buses
executed after June 30, 2030. This act shall not be construed to require any educational entity to
equip buses with seat belts at all designated seating positions if the buses are purchased or leased
before June 30, 2030.
Page 4 House Bill 1204-First Edition